Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 44.1 The Rhode Island Museum Property Act

34-44.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context indicates another or different meaning or intent:

“Museum” means an organized and permanent nonprofit or public institution in Rhode Island operated by, or a division of, a nonprofit corporation, trust, association, educational institution, or public agency, that is primarily educational, scientific, historic, or aesthetic in purpose, and that owns, borrows, cares for, studies, archives, or exhibits property. Museums may include, but not be limited to, historical societies, parks, historic sites and monuments, archives, and libraries;

“Property” means any tangible object in the possession of and under a museum’s care that has intrinsic educational, scientific, historical, artistic, aesthetic, or cultural value, excluding the property of any agency or public body as defined in §

38-1-1.1

;

“Loan” or “loaned” means a deposit with a museum that: (i) Title to the property is not transferred to the museum, (ii) The loan agreement for such deposit does not include a provision that the museum acquire title at some time after such deposit is made; or (iii) The loan agreement for such deposit includes an option for the museum to acquire title at some time after such deposit is made;

“Lender” means a person (an individual, association, partnership, corporation, trust, estate, or other entity, excluding the property of any agency or public body as defined in §

38-1-1.1

) whose name appears on the records of a museum as the person legally entitled to, or claiming to be legally entitled to, property held by the museum or, if such person is deceased, the legal heirs of such person.

“Undocumented property” means property under a museum’s care, excluding the property of any agency or public body as defined in §

38-1-1.1

, whose ownership cannot be determined by reference to the museum’s records and for which the museum does not have a reasonable means of determining the owner.

“Publication” means inclusion in the online publication of lists of abandoned property established pursuant to §

33-21.1-18

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 74, § 1.

34-44.1-2.
Property held subject to a loan agreement.

Any property on loan to a museum that is subject to a loan agreement shall be deemed to be donated to the museum if:

No claim of ownership is made or action filed to recover such property by the owner or lender after termination or expiration of the loan; and

The museum has given notice, in accordance with the provisions of §

34-44.1-5

of this chapter, and no claim of ownership is made or action to recover such property is filed on or before sixty (60) days after the publication of the notice.

A museum may terminate a loan of property for any property that was loaned to the museum for an indefinite term if the property has been in the possession of the museum for at least five (5) years. Any property on loan to a museum and whose loan agreement indicates that such property is on permanent loan to the museum shall be considered loaned for an indefinite term for purposes of this subsection. The property for any loan of property that has been terminated pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed donated to the museum.

A museum may terminate a loan of property for any property that was loaned to the museum for a specified term after the expiration of such specified term, provided the museum provides notice of such termination in accordance with the provisions of §

34-44.1-5

of this chapter. The property for any loan of property that has been terminated pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed donated to the museum.

It shall be the responsibility of the lender of property loaned to a museum to provide the museum with written notice of any change of the lender’s address, of the lender’s designated agent, of the designated agent’s address, and of the name of the new owner or lender if there is a change in the ownership of the property loaned to the museum.

A museum accepting a loan of property shall inform the lender of such property in writing of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.

34-44.1-3.
Property held without a loan agreement.

Any property in the possession of a museum that is not subject to a loan agreement shall be deemed to be abandoned if:

The property is unclaimed and has been in the possession of the museum as unclaimed property for at least five (5) years;

The museum has given notice, in accordance with the provisions of §

34-44.1-5

; and

No claim of ownership is made or action to recover such property is filed on or before sixty (60) days after the publication of the notice.

Any abandoned property in the possession of a museum shall become the property of such museum.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.

34-44.1-4.
Maintenance of records.

On or after the effective date of this chapter, each museum shall maintain a record of all property on loan to the museum which shall include, if known, the name and address of the lender and the dates that the property is to be on loan to the museum and a copy of the loan agreement for the property. The museum shall provide a copy of the record and the loan agreement to the lender of property at the time that the lender makes the loan of property to the museum. If a museum is notified of a change in ownership of any property on loan to the museum, the museum shall create a new record for the property and update the existing loan agreement and shall provide a written copy of the new record and the updated loan agreement to the new owner of the property. A museum shall retain all written records regarding property acquired under this chapter for at least ten (10) years from the date that the museum acquired title to the property or until dissolution of the museum, whichever occurs first.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.

34-44.1-5.
Notice requirements.

Prior to a museum accepting donated property pursuant to §

34-44.1-2

, or taking ownership of abandoned property pursuant to §

34-44.1-3

, the museum shall make a reasonable good faith effort to find the address of the lender and provide notice that the museum may become the owner of the property. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the lender on record with the museum.

If the museum does not have an address on record for the lender of the property, or the museum does not receive written proof of receipt of the mailed notice within thirty (30) days after the date the notice was mailed, notice shall be published for a duration of six (6) months in the lists of abandoned property advertised by the general treasurer as prescribed in §

33-21.1-18

. The museum shall provide to the general treasurer the following information to be included in the notice:

The name and address of the museum and a brief and general description of the unclaimed property, including date of the property or the approximate date the property came into the custody of the museum;

If known, the name and address of the lender on record with the museum, if any;

A request that all persons who may have any knowledge of the whereabouts of the lender provide written notice to the museum;

The name and contact information of the person at the museum to be contacted regarding the property; and

A statement that if no claim of ownership is made or action to recover the property is filed with the museum on or before sixty (60) days from the last day that the notice is included in the unclaimed property publication, the property shall be deemed donated or abandoned and shall become the property of the museum.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.

34-44.1-6.
Property vested in museum.

If a museum receives a timely written claim of ownership for any property for which notice of donation or abandonment was made, pursuant to §

34-44.1-5

, from the lender on record with the museum, or the designated agent of such lender, the museum shall return the property to the lender or carry out the disposition of such property as the lender requests not later than sixty (60) days after receipt of such written claim of ownership, provided the lender shall advise the museum in writing as to the disposition of such property or how such property is to be returned to the lender. Any costs incurred as a result of returning such property or the disposition of such property shall be the responsibility of the lender unless the lender and the museum have mutually agreed to alternate arrangements.

If a museum receives a written claim of ownership for any property for which notice of donation or abandonment was made, pursuant to §

34-44.1-5

, from a person other than the lender on record with the museum, the museum shall, not later than sixty (60) days after receipt of such written claim of ownership, determine if such ownership claim is valid. A claimant shall submit proof of ownership to the museum with such written claim of ownership. If more than one person submits a written claim of ownership, the museum may delay its determination of ownership until the competing claims are resolved by agreement or legal action. A museum shall not be obligated to initiate legal action to resolve competing claims. If the museum determines that the written claim of ownership is valid or if the competing claims are resolved by agreement or judicial action, the museum shall return the property to the claimant submitting the valid claim of ownership or dispose of the property as the valid claimant requests. Any costs incurred as a result of returning the property or the disposition of the property shall be the responsibility of the valid claimant unless the valid claimant and the museum have mutually agreed to alternate arrangements.

If no written claim of ownership is presented to the museum on or before sixty (60) days after the publication of the notice, the property shall be deemed donated or abandoned and title to the property shall vest in the museum.

Any person who purchases or otherwise acquires property from a museum that obtained the property by donation or abandonment pursuant to this section and §§

34-44.1-2

and

34-44.1-3

, shall acquire good title to such property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.

34-44.1-7.
Application of conservation measures to property on loan to a museum.

Unless a written loan agreement provides otherwise, a museum may apply conservation or protective measures to, or dispose of, undocumented property or property on loan to the museum without the lender’s or claimant’s permission or formal notice if immediate action is required to protect the property on loan or other property in the custody of the museum, or because the property on loan has become a hazard to the health and safety of the public or to the museum’s staff, and if one of the following applies:

The property poses an immediate risk of harm to the museum’s staff or collection or to the general public, in which case the museum may dispose of the property without delay and shall notify the lender or claimant of the action taken within thirty (30) days; or

The museum is unable to contact the lender at the address on record for the lender within three (3) days before the time the museum determines action is necessary; or

The lender does not: (i) Respond or agree to the conservation or protective measures recommended by the museum; and (ii) Does not or is unable to terminate the loan and take possession of such property within the time the museum determines that action is necessary.

If a museum applies conservation or protective measures to any property on loan to the museum under this section, unless the written loan agreement for the property provides otherwise, the museum shall acquire a lien on the property in an amount equal to the costs incurred by the museum for any conservation or protective measures taken.

The museum shall not be liable for injury to or loss of any property that was on loan to the museum and for which conservation or protective measures were taken under this section, if the museum: (1) Had a reasonable belief at the time the conservation or protective measures were taken that such measures were necessary to protect the property or other property in the possession of the museum, or that the property was a hazard to the health and safety of the public or museum staff, and (2) Exercised reasonable care in the choice and application of the conservation and protective measures.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.

34-44.1-8.
Scope.

The provisions of this chapter shall:

Not be construed to abrogate the rights and obligations of a lender, claimant or museum identified in a written loan agreement, unless the requirements of §

34-44.1-2

have been fulfilled;

Not preclude a museum from availing itself of any other means of establishing or perfecting title to property in the possession of the museum.

This chapter applies to all property held by or in the custody of a museum on or after the effective date of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 219, § 1.